District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5201

“Gift enterprise” defined.

Omitted.

History

Leg. Assem., Aug. 23, 1871, p. 96, ch. 69, § 21

Editor's Notes

This section was omitted because §§ 22-5202 and 22-5203 were repealed in 1961 making § 22-5201 obsolete.

Gift enterprise — Prohibited; penalty. [Repealed].

Repealed.

(Sept. 21, 1961, 75 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 87-267, § 1.)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3402, 22-3403.